Idaho, session 2026, H0678.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 11, Title 36, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 36-1106, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
36-1106. CHECKING TRAPS. (1) A person setting or placing a trap or
snare for gray wolf shall:
(a) Inspect each trap and snare every seventy-two (72) hours; and
(b) Act to promptly remove any catch therein.
(2) To comply with subsection (1) of this section, a person may inspect
such person's traps and snares by:
(a) Visiting each trap and snare in person; or
(b) Using a remote transmitting camera that has an unobstructed view of
the trap or snare.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.